California, session 20252026, SB226.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 53369.3 of the Government Code is amended to read:53369.3. (a) A district may finance (1) the purchase, construction, expansion, improvement, seismic retrofit, or rehabilitation of any real or other tangible property with an estimated useful life of 15 years or longer which satisfies the requirements of subdivision (b), (2) planning and design work that is directly related to the purchase, construction, expansion, improvement, rehabilitation, or seismic retrofit of that property, and (3) the costs described in Sections 53369.6 and 53369.31. The facilities need not be physically located within the boundaries of the district. A district may not finance routine maintenance, repair work, or the costs of ongoing operation or providing services of any kind.(b) The district shall finance only facilities or projects of communitywide significance, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(1) Highways, interchanges, ramps and bridges, arterial streets, parking facilities, and transit facilities.(2) Sewage treatment and water reclamation plants and interceptor pipes.(3) Facilities and watershed lands used for the collection and treatment of water for urban uses.(4) Flood management, including levees, bypasses, dams, retention basins, and drainage channels.(5) Child care facilities.(6) Libraries.(7) Parks, recreational facilities, open space, and habitat restoration.(8) Facilities for the transfer and disposal of solid waste, including transfer stations and vehicles.(9) Brownfields restoration and other environmental mitigation.(10) Purchase of land and property for development purposes and related site improvements.(11) Acquisition, construction, or repair of housing for rental or purchase, including multipurpose facilities.(12) Acquisition, construction, or repair of commercial or industrial structures for private use. use, including, but not limited to, entertainment or sports facilities.(13) The repayment of the transfer of funds to a military base reuse authority pursuant to Section 67851 that occurred on or after the creation of the district.(c) Any district that constructs dwelling units shall set aside not less than 20 percent of those units to increase and improve the community’s supply of low- and moderate-income housing available at an affordable housing cost, as defined by Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or at an affordable rent, as defined by Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, to persons and families of low and moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.(d) A district may utilize any powers under the Polanco Redevelopment Act (Article 12.5 (commencing with Section 33459) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code), and finance any action necessary to implement that act.(e) A district may finance any project that implements a sustainable communities strategy prepared pursuant to Section 65080.SECTION 1.Article 6 (commencing with Section 74298) is added to Chapter 5 of Part 46 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read:6.Special Transfer of Territory74298.(a)This article shall only apply to the transfer of territory from a community college district that meets both of the following criteria:(1)The community college district is located in a county whose territory is divided among three or more community college districts and a majority of the population residing in the territory of each of those districts is located in one or more other counties.(2)The community college district territory is being transferred, in whole or in part, to one of the districts described in paragraph (1).(b)Notwithstanding Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 74100) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 74201), the transfer of territory to another community college district pursuant to this article may be approved by the board of governors upon its own initiative or upon the filing of a petition by the governing board of a district or the county committee on school district organization for the county where territory would be transferred.(c)In approving a transfer of territory pursuant to this article, the board of governors shall ensure that the transfer of territory and any necessary agreements between the community college districts comply with and meet the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 74270), Article 3 (commencing with Section 74280), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 74290).(d)An action to transfer territory that is approved by the board of governors pursuant to this article shall be deemed as approved for purposes of Section 74250, without election.